Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 6. Certified Checks; Nonpayment of Instrument

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of bank in connection with night depository service, 77 ALR3d 597.

Certificate of deposit as “security” under federal securities laws, 82 ALR Fed 553.

§ 13-3-601.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

2-1-203

by Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3.

§ 13-3-602.
Certified checks.

The amount of any check certified shall immediately be charged to the drawer’s account and credited to a certified check account from which the check is payable.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 45; R.S. 1931, § 10-147; C.S. 1945, § 35-150; W.S. 1957, § 13-32; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to refusal to pay certified checks, see § 34.1-3-411.

As to certified check being an exception to six months rule relating to payment, see § 34.1-4-404.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Avoidance of bank's check certification secured by fraud, 100 ALR2d 1197.

Right of bank certifying check or note by mistake to cancel or avoid effect of certification, 25 ALR3d 1367.

§ 13-3-603.
Nonpayment of instrument when person influenced by alcohol or drugs.

Any bank may refuse to pay any check, draft or order upon it if the officers or owners of the bank have reason to believe that the person signing or endorsing the instrument is or was so under the influence of alcohol or drugs as to make it doubtful whether the person is or was capable of transacting business at the time of signing or endorsing the instrument. No cause of action accrues against the bank by reason of the refusal of a bank or officer to pay an instrument under this section.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 44; R.S. 1931, § 10-146; C.S. 1945, § 35-149; W.S. 1957, § 13-31; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1.